nl: Zonnestelselmodel schaal: Afmetingen en afstanden bij benadering; Niet op schaal; Schema alleen met baan; Alleen relatieve afstanden/banen; Alleen relatieve planeetafmetingen; Anders
nb: Skalering av solsystemmodell: Omtrentlige størrelser og avstander; Ikke i målestokk; Kun baneskjema; Kun relative avstander/baner; Kun relative planetstørrelser; Annet
pt-PT: Escala do modelo do sistema solar: Tamanhos e distâncias aproximados; Não à escala; Esquema apenas de órbita; Apenas distâncias/órbitas relativas; Apenas tamanhos relativos dos planetas; Outro
cs: Škálování modelu sluneční soustavy: Přibližné velikosti a vzdálenosti; Není v měřítku; Pouze schéma oběžných drah; Pouze relativní vzdálenosti / oběžné dráhy; Pouze relativní velikosti planet; Jiné
it: Scala del modello del sistema solare: Dimensioni e distanze approssimative; Non in scala; Schematico solo orbite; Solo distanze/orbite relative; Solo dimensioni relative dei pianeti; Altro
ko: 태양계 모델 축척: 대략적인 크기 및 거리; 축척 무시; 궤도 전용 도식화; 상대적 거리/궤도 전용; 상대적 행성 크기 전용; 기타
zh-CN: 太阳系模型比例缩放: 大致尺寸和距离; 未按比例; 仅显示轨道的示意图; 仅显示相对距离/轨道; 仅显示相对行星尺寸; 其他
sk-SK: Mierka modelu slnečnej sústavy: Približné veľkosti a vzdialenosti; Nie je v mierke; Schéma len s obežnými dráhami; Len relatívne vzdialenosti/obežné dráhy; Len relatívne veľkosti planét; Iné
ro-RO: Scară a modelului sistemului solar: Dimensiuni și distanțe aproximative; Nescalat; Doar schemă orbită; Doar distanțe relative/orbite; Doar dimensiuni relative ale planetelor; Altele
zh-TW: 太陽系模型比例: 大約尺寸與距離; 未按比例; 僅軌道示意圖; 僅相對距離/軌道; 僅相對行星尺寸; 其他
th: การปรับขนาดแบบจำลองระบบสุริยะ: ขนาดและระยะทางโดยประมาณ; ไม่ได้สัดส่วน; แผนผังวงโคจรเท่านั้น; ระยะทาง/วงโคจรเปรียบเทียบเท่านั้น; ขนาดดาวเคราะห์เปรียบเทียบเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
fi: Aurinkokuntamallin mittakaava: Arvioidut koot ja etäisyydet; Ei mittakaavassa; Vain kiertoratakaavio; Vain suhteelliset etäisyydet/kiertoradat; Vain suhteelliset planeettojen koot; Muu
hu: Naprendszer-modell méretezése: Hozzávetőleges méretek és távolságok; Nem méretarányos; Csak pályavázlat; Csak relatív távolságok/pályák; Csak relatív bolygóméretek; Egyéb
tr: Güneş sistemi modeli ölçeklendirmesi: Yaklaşık boyutlar ve mesafeler; Ölçekli değil; Yalnızca yörünge şeması; Yalnızca göreceli mesafeler/yörüngeler; Yalnızca göreceli gezegen boyutları; Diğer
hr-HR: Razmjer modela Sunčevog sustava: Približne veličine i udaljenosti; Nije u mjerilu; Shema samo s orbitama; Samo relativne udaljenosti/orbite; Samo relativne veličine planeta; Ostalo
de: Maßstab des Sonnensystemmodells: Ungefähre Größen und Entfernungen; Nicht maßstabsgetreu; Nur orbitale schematische Darstellung; Nur relative Entfernungen/Umlaufbahnen; Nur relative Planetengrößen; Andere
sl-SI: Skaliranje modela sončnega sistema: Približne velikosti in razdalje; Ni v merilu; Shema samo za orbite; Samo relativne razdalje/orbite; Samo relativne velikosti planetov; Drugo
es: Escalado del modelo del sistema solar: Tamaños y distancias aproximados; Sin escala; Esquema de órbita únicamente; Solo distancias u órbitas relativas; Solo tamaños de planetas relativos; Otro
bg-BG: Мащабиране на модела на слънчевата система: Приблизителни размери и разстояния; Без мащаб; Схематично (само орбити); Само относителни разстояния/орбити; Само относителни размери на планетите; Друго
sv: Skalning av solsystemmodell: Ungefärliga storlekar och avstånd; Inte skalenlig; Endast omloppsbana (schematisk); Endast relativa avstånd/omloppsbanor; Endast relativa planetstorlekar; Övrigt
fr: Mise à l’échelle du modèle du système solaire: Tailles et distances approximatives; Pas à l’échelle; Schéma des orbites uniquement; Distances relatives/orbites uniquement; Tailles relatives des planètes uniquement; Autre
el: Κλίμακα μοντέλου ηλιακού συστήματος: Κατά προσέγγιση μεγέθη και αποστάσεις; Εκτός κλίμακας; Σχηματικό μόνο με τροχιές; Σχετικές αποστάσεις/τροχιές μόνο; Σχετικά μεγέθη πλανητών μόνο; Άλλο
en: Solar system model scaling: Approximate sizes and distances; Not to scale; Orbit-only schematic; Relative distances/orbits only; Relative planet sizes only; Other
ru: Масштабирование модели Солнечной системы: Приблизительные размеры и расстояния; Не в масштабе; Только схема орбит; Только относительные расстояния/орбиты; Только относительные размеры планет; Другое
vi: Mô hình hệ mặt trời thu nhỏ: Kích thước và khoảng cách tương đối; Không theo tỷ lệ; Sơ đồ chỉ hiển thị quỹ đạo; Chỉ khoảng cách/quỹ đạo tương đối; Chỉ kích thước hành tinh tương đối; Khác
pl: Skala modelu Układu Słonecznego: Przybliżone rozmiary i odległości; Brak skali; Schematyczny (tylko orbity); Tylko względne odległości / orbity; Tylko względne rozmiary planet; Inne
da: Skalaforhold for solsystemmodel: Omtrentlige størrelser og afstande; Ikke målfast; Kun skematisk for kredsløb; Kun relative afstande/kredsløb; Kun relative planetstørrelser; Andet
lt-LT: Saulės sistemos modelio mastelis: Apytiksliai dydžiai ir atstumai; Neatitinka mastelio; Tik orbitų schema; Tik santykiniai atstumai / orbitos; Tik santykiniai planetų dydžiai; Kita
ja: 太陽系モデルスケール: おおよそのサイズと距離; 縮尺なし; 軌道のみの模式図; 相対的な距離 / 軌道のみ; 相対的な惑星のサイズのみ; その他
pt-BR: Modelo de sistema solar escala: Tamanhos e distâncias aproximados; Fora de escala; Esquema apenas de órbitas; Apenas distâncias/órbitas relativas; Apenas tamanhos relativos dos planetas; Outra